Utah statutes.
73-18-20.5.   Reporting of theft and recovery of vessels.
(1) (a)  Any peace officer upon receiving reliable information that any vessel
or outboard motor has been stolen shall immediately report the theft to the
Criminal Investigations and Technical Services Division of the Department of
Public Safety, established in Section 53-10-103.
(b)  Any peace officer upon receiving information that any vessel or outboard
motor which was previously reported as stolen has been recovered shall
immediately report the recovery to his law enforcement agency and to the
Criminal Investigations and Technical Services Division.
(2)  The reporting and recovery procedures for vessels and outboard motors
shall be the same as those specified in Section 41-1a-1401 for motor vehicles.
